Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1230 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this act:
1. "Assignment agreement" means any instrument by which post-
loss benefits under an auto or residential or commercial property
insurance, including, but not limited to, any right of action
against the insurer or any proceeds acquired from the insurer, are
assigned, transferred, or acquired in any other manner, in whole or
in part, to or from a person providing services, including, but not
limited to, communicating with an insurer on an insured's behalf or
inspecting, estimating, protecting, repairing, restoring, or
replacing the property or mitigating against further damage to the
property; and
2. "Person" means:
a. a natural person,

b. a service provider,
c. any type or form of corporation, company, partnership,
proprietorship, association, or other legal entity,
and
d. a government, governmental subdivision or agency, or
other governmental body.
B. 1. A person shall not solicit or accept an assignment, in
whole or in part, of any post-loss insurance benefit for property
damage under an auto collision or comprehensive policy, residential
property insurance policy, or commercial property insurance policy.
An assignment agreement is against public policy and is null and
void, and any contract entered in violation of this section shall be
void and unenforceable.
2. The provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection do not
apply to any of the following:
a. an assignment, transfer, pledge, or conveyance granted
to a federally insured financial institution,
mortgagee, or a subsequent purchaser of the property,
or
b. liability coverage under an auto, residential, or
commercial property insurance policy.
C. Violation of subsection B of this section is considered an
unfair or deceptive trade practice. Any person who is found to have
violated the provisions of subsection B of this section shall be
subject to the procedures and penalties as other unfair or deceptive
trade practices outlined in Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit an
attorney from collecting an attorney fee for an action related to a
property insurance claim.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
insured from authorizing or directing payment to, or paying, a
person for services, materials, or any other thing which may be, or
is, covered under an insurance policy. Insurers shall issue payment
directly to a person for services, materials, and other items that
are covered under an insurance policy, when the insured agrees that
ENR. H. B. NO. 1084 Page 2

any person providing such services should be paid directly, subject
to applicable liens.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1084 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1084 Page 4